hu: Üzlet és ipar > Orvosi > Orvosi oktatási berendezések > Orvosi oktatóeszközök tartozékai: Szimulátorkiegészítők; Szimulátor-horddoboz és szállítás; Szintetikus szövetbetétek és pótbőrök; Edzőgépalkatrészek és fogyóeszközök
lt-LT: Verslas ir pramonė > Medicina > Medicinos mokymo įranga > Medicinos mokymo įrangos priedai: Simuliatorių priedai; Simuliatorių dėklai ir transportavimas; Sintetinių audinių įdėklai ir pakaitinės odos; Treniruoklių atsarginės dalys ir eksploatacinės medžiagos
fr: Entreprise et industrie > Secteur médical > Matériel d’enseignement médical > Accessoires pour matériel pédagogique médical: Accessoires pour simulateurs; Housses et étuis de transport pour simulateurs; Inserts de tissus synthétiques et peaux de remplacement; Pièces de rechange et consommables pour formateurs
hr-HR: Posao i industrija > Medicina > Medicinska oprema za učenje > Pribor za medicinsku opremu za učenje: Pribor za simulatore; Torbe za nošenje i prijevoz simulatora; Umetci od sintetičkog tkiva i zamjenske kože; Rezervni dijelovi i potrošni materijal za trenažere
de: Wirtschaft & Industrie > Medizinischer Bereich > Medizinische Schulungsgeräte > Zubehör für medizinische Schulungsgeräte: Simulatorzubehör; Trage- & Transportkiste für den Simulator; Synthetische Gewebeeinlagen und Ersatzhäute; Ersatzteile und Verbrauchsmaterialien für Trainer:innen
el: Επιχειρηματικός & βιομηχανικός εξοπλισμός > Ιατρικά είδη > Ιατρικός εκπαιδευτικός εξοπλισμός > Αξεσουάρ ιατρικού εκπαιδευτικού εξοπλισμού: Αξεσουάρ προσομοιωτή; Θήκες μεταφοράς και μεταφοράς προσομοιωτή; Συνθετικά ένθετα ιστών και δέρματα αντικατάστασης; Ανταλλακτικά και αναλώσιμα για εξοπλισμό εκπαίδευσης
tr: İş ve Endüstri > Medikal > Tıp Eğitimi Ekipmanları > Tıp Eğitim Ekipmanları Aksesuarları: Simülatör Aksesuarları; Simülatör Taşıma Çantaları ve Nakliye; Sentetik Doku Eklemeleri ve Yedek Deriler; Eğitici Yedek Parçaları ve Sarf Malzemeleri
it: Commercio e industria > Medicina > Apparecchiature formative per medici > Accessori per apparecchiature didattiche mediche: Accessori per simulatori; Custodie per il trasporto di simulatori; Inserti in tessuto sintetico e pelli sostitutive; Parti di ricambio e materiali di consumo per trainer
fi: Yritys ja teollisuus > Lääketiede > Lääketieteelliset opetusvälineet > Lääketieteellisten opetusvälineiden lisävarusteet: Simulaattoreiden lisävarusteet; Simulaattoreiden kantokassit ja kuljetus; Synteettiset kudoslisäkkeet ja vaihtonahat; Harjoitteluvälineiden varaosat ja kulutustarvikkeet
ko: 비즈니스/산업 > 의료 > 의료 교육 장비 > 의료 교육 장비 액세서리: 시뮬레이터 액세서리; 시뮬레이터 운반 케이스 및 운송; 합성 조직 인서트 및 교체용 스킨; 트레이너 교체 부품 및 소모품
ja: ビジネス・産業 > 医療 > 医療教育用品 > 医療教育機器アクセサリー: シミュレータアクセサリー; シミュレータ用キャリングケース・運搬用品; 合成組織インサートと交換用スキン; トレーナー交換部品と消耗品
pt-BR: Comercial e industrial > Medicina > Equipamento de ensino médico > Acessórios para equipamentos de ensino médico: Acessórios para simuladores; Maletas e transporte para simuladores; Inserções de tecido sintético e peles de substituição; Peças de reposição e consumíveis para treinadores
pt-PT: Business e industrial > Médico > Equipamento de ensino médico > Acessórios para equipamentos de ensino médico: Acessórios para simulador; Caixa de transporte e transporte para simulador; Inserções de tecido sintético e peles de substituição; Peças de substituição e consumíveis para o treinador
nb: Forretninger og industri > Medisinsk > Medisinsk opplæringsutstyr > Tilbehør til medisinsk undervisningsutstyr: Tilbehør til simulator; Bærevesker og transport til simulator; Syntetiske vevsinnlegg og erstatningshud; Reservedeler og forbruksvarer til treningsapparater
ru: Бизнес и промышленность > Медицина > Медицинское оборудование для обучения > Аксессуары для медицинского оборудования для обучения: Аксессуары для симуляторов; Сумки и футляры для переноски симуляторов; Сменные вставки и покрытия из искусственных тканей; Запасные детали и расходные материалы для тренажеров
sl-SI: Posel in industrija > Zdravstvo > Medicinska učna oprema > Dodatki za opremo za medicinsko poučevanje: Dodatki za simulatorje; Torbe in transport za simulatorje; Sintetični vložki iz tkiva in nadomestne kože; Nadomestni deli in potrošni material pripomočkov za učenje
nl: Zakelijk en industrieel > Medisch > Apparatuur voor medisch onderwijs > Accessoires voor medische lesapparatuur: Simulatoraccessoires; Simulator draagkoffers en transport; Synthetische weefselinlays en vervanghuiden; Vervangingsonderdelen en verbruiksartikelen voor de trainer
th: ธุรกิจและอุตสาหกรรม > การแพทย์ > อุปกรณ์ช่วยสอนทางการแพทย์ > อุปกรณ์เสริมสำหรับอุปกรณ์การสอนทางการแพทย์: อุปกรณ์เสริมสำหรับเครื่องจำลอง; กระเป๋าพกพาและการขนส่งเครื่องจำลอง; เนื้อเยื่อสังเคราะห์สำหรับใส่และผิวหนังทดแทน; อะไหล่และวัสดุสิ้นเปลืองสำหรับเครื่องฝึกซ้อม
pl: Biznes i przemysł > Branża medyczna > Sprzęt do szkoleń medycznych > Akcesoria do medycznego sprzętu szkoleniowego: Akcesoria do symulatorów; Pokrowce i systemy transportowe do symulatorów; Syntetyczne wkłady tkankowe i skóry wymienne; Części zamienne i materiały eksploatacyjne do trenażerów
zh-CN: 商业/工业 > 医疗 > 医疗教学设备 > 医疗教学设备配件: 模拟器配件; 模拟器便携箱与运输设备; 合成组织植入物与替换皮肤; 训练器替换零件与耗材
vi: Kinh doanh & Công nghiệp > Y tế > Thiết bị giảng dạy y tế > Phụ kiện Thiết bị Giảng dạy Y khoa: Phụ kiện Mô hình Mô phỏng; Hộp đựng & Vận chuyển Mô hình Mô phỏng; Miếng đệm Mô Tổng hợp & Da Thay thế; Phụ tùng Thay thế & Vật tư Tiêu hao cho Mô hình Huấn luyện
sv: Företag och industri > Sjukvård > Medicinsk utbildningsutrustning > Tillbehör för medicinsk undervisningsutrustning: Simulatortillbehör; Simulatorväskor och transport; Syntetiska vävnadsinlägg och ersättningsskinn; Reservdelar och förbrukningsartiklar till träningsmaskiner
da: Erhverv og industri > Medicinsk > Medicinsk undervisningsudstyr > Tilbehør til medicinsk undervisningsudstyr: Simulatortilbehør; Simulator-bæreæsker og transport; Syntetiske vævsindsatser og erstatningshud; Reservedele og forbrugsvarer til underviser
sk-SK: Obchod a priemysel > Zdravotníctvo > Zdravotnícke vyučovacie zariadenia > Príslušenstvo pre zdravotnícke vyučovacie zariadenia: Príslušenstvo k simulátorom; Prepravné puzdrá a kufre pre simulátory; Syntetické tkanivové vložky a náhradné kože; Náhradné diely a spotrebný materiál pre trenažéry
es: Economía e industria > Productos médicos > Equipos para la docencia médica > Accesorios de equipos para la docencia médica: Accesorios del simulador; Simulador de caja de transporte y transporte; Inserciones de tejido sintético y sustitutos cutáneos; Piezas de repuesto y consumibles para capacitadores
cs: Obchod a průmysl > Zdravotnictví > Výukové pomůcky pro zdravotnické a lékařské obory > Příslušenství k výukovému lékařskému vybavení: Příslušenství simulátoru; Přepravní obaly a doprava simulátorů; Syntetické tkáňové vložky a náhradní kůže; Náhradní díly a spotřební materiál pro trenažéry
bg-BG: Бизнес и промишленост > Медицински > Медицинско учебно оборудване > Аксесоари за оборудване за медицинско обучение: Аксесоари за симулатори; Калъфи за носене и транспорт на медицински симулатори; Вложки от синтетична тъкан и резервни кожи; Резервни части и консумативи за треньори
ro-RO: Afaceri și sectorul industrial > Sectorul medical > Echipament medical pentru pregătire > Accesorii pentru echipamente didactice medicale: Accesorii pentru simulatoare; Cutii de transport și transport simulatoare; Inserții de țesut sintetic și înlocuitori sintetici de piele; Piese de schimb și consumabile pentru formator
en: Business & Industrial > Medical > Medical Teaching Equipment > Medical Teaching Equipment Accessories: Simulator Accessories; Simulator Carrying Cases & Transport; Synthetic Tissue Inserts & Replacement Skins; Trainer Replacement Parts & Consumables
zh-TW: 商業與各產業 > 醫療業 > 醫療教育設備 > 醫療教育設備配件: 模擬器配件; 模擬器攜行箱與運輸設備; 合成組織植入物與替換皮膚; 訓練機更換零件與耗材